Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1476
Mobile home space improvements; ownership; duty of tenant.

Unless otherwise agreed in writing between the landlord and tenant, any improvement, other than a natural lawn, purchased and installed by a tenant on a mobile home space shall remain the property of the tenant even though affixed to or in the ground and may be removed or disposed of by the tenant prior to the termination of the tenancy. A tenant shall leave the mobile home space in substantially the same or better condition than upon taking possession.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 27.